Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.250

Retirement and job security rights preserved upon annexation, etc., of district.

If all or any portion of a fire protection district is annexed to or incorporated into a city or town, or is succeeded by a metropolitan municipal corporation or county fire department, no full time paid firefighter affected by such annexation, incorporation or succession shall receive a reduction in his or her retirement and job security rights: PROVIDED, That this section shall not apply to any retirement and job security rights authorized under chapter 41.24 RCW.

[ 2007 c 218 s 40; 1963 c 63 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.